Massachusetts, session 194th, H787.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 19A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 44 the following section:
Section 45.
(a) There shall be a special commission established within the executive office of elder
affairs for the purpose of investigating and studying the feasibility of establishing dedicated
senior-specific shelters in the commonwealth. The commission shall examine the unique needs
of homeless seniors, evaluate existing resources, and propose recommendations to address gaps
in services and housing for this population.
(b) The commission shall examine, without limitation:
the prevalence of homelessness and housing insecurity among seniors, including rates
and causes of homelessness for individuals over 60 years of age;
of 4

current shelter resources available to older adults and the unique physical, mental, and
social needs of seniors experiencing homelessness;
the feasibility of developing senior-specific shelters, including potential locations, sizes,
and services offered;
funding mechanisms for such shelters, including federal grants, state appropriations,
municipal partnerships, private sponsorships, and other potential revenue sources;
existing models and best practices in other states or municipalities that provide senior-
specific shelter services, focusing on staffing, security, health services, mental health care,
nutrition, and community-based programs;
the role of government agencies, nonprofit organizations, advocacy groups, healthcare
providers, and community leaders in establishing and operating senior-specific shelters; and
any legislative or regulatory changes needed to facilitate the creation and operation of
such shelters, including zoning requirements, licensing standards, staff training guidelines, data
collection, and reporting requirements.
(c) The commission shall consist of the following members or their designees, who shall
serve without compensation:
the secretary of elder affairs, who shall serve as chair;
the secretary of health and human services;
the secretary of housing and economic development;
of 4

two members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, one of whom shall be
a member of the joint committee on elder affairs;
two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house, one
of whom shall be a member of the joint committee on elder affairs;
the commissioner of public health;
the executive director of the Massachusetts Municipal Association or a designee;
two representatives from nonprofit organizations specializing in elder affairs and/or
homelessness, appointed by the governor;
one representative from a statewide shelter providers’ coalition; and
two members appointed by the governor with demonstrated expertise in senior issues,
housing policy, or social services.
(d) The commission shall organize as soon as practicable upon the appointment of its
members. The commission may request from all state agencies such information and assistance
as may be necessary to carry out its duties. The commission may hold public hearings, gather
testimony, and travel within the commonwealth to conduct such hearings.
(e) The commission shall, on or before December 31, 2026, file a report of its findings
and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, with the clerks of the senate and
house of representatives, the joint committee on elder affairs, and the house and senate
committees on ways and means. The report shall be made publicly available on the official
website of the general court.
of 4

(f) The commission shall dissolve 30 days following the submission of its report.
SECTION 2.
This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 4